Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202082-604
Owner; liability for injury, death, or damages; limitation on action; exception.

(1) Except as provided in section 82-605, an owner who allows a participant on the owner's premises for agritourism activities shall not be liable for injury to or death of the participant or damage to the participant's property resulting from an inherent risk on the owner's premises.

(2) Except as provided in section 82-605, no participant or participant's representative shall maintain an action against or recover for injury to or death of the participant or damage to the participant's property resulting from an inherent risk on the owner's premises when such owner allows the participant on the owner's premises for agritourism activities.

Laws 2015, LB329, § 4.